test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Nouns_NeutInan_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - понятие M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      понятие+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom: понятие
      понятие+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc: понятие
      понятие+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen: понятия
      понятие+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc: понятии
      понятие+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat: понятию
      понятие+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins: понятием
      понятие+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Nom: понятия
      понятие+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Acc: понятия
      понятие+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Gen: понятий
      понятие+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Loc: понятиях
      понятие+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Dat: понятиям
      понятие+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Ins: понятиями
  Noun - чувство M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      чувство+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom: чувство
      чувство+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc: чувство
      чувство+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen: чувства
      чувство+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc: чувстве
      чувство+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat: чувству
      чувство+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins: чувством
      чувство+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Nom: чувства
      чувство+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Acc: чувства
      чувство+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Gen: чувств
      чувство+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Loc: чувствах
      чувство+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Dat: чувствам
      чувство+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Ins: чувствами
  Noun - яблоко M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      яблоко+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom: яблоко
      яблоко+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc: яблоко
      яблоко+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen: яблока
      яблоко+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc: яблоке
      яблоко+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat: яблоку
      яблоко+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins: яблоком
      яблоко+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Nom: яблоки
      яблоко+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Acc: яблоки
      яблоко+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Gen: яблок
      яблоко+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Loc: яблоках
      яблоко+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Dat: яблокам
      яблоко+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Ins: яблоками
  Noun - существо M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      существо²+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom: существо
      существо²+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc: существо
      существо²+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen: существа
      существо²+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc: существе
      существо²+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat: существу
      существо²+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins: существом
      существо²+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Nom: существа
      существо²+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Acc: существа
      существо²+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Gen: существ
      существо²+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Loc: существах
      существо²+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Dat: существам
      существо²+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Ins: существами
  Noun - вино M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      вино+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom: вино
      вино+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc: вино
      вино+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen: вина
      вино+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc: вине
      вино+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat: вину
      вино+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins: вином
      вино+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Nom: вина
      вино+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Acc: вина
      вино+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Gen: вин
      вино+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Loc: винах
      вино+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Dat: винам
      вино+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Ins: винами
  Noun - море M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      море+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom: море
      море+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc: море
      море+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen: моря
      море+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc: море
      море+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat: морю
      море+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins: морем
      море+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Nom: моря
      море+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Acc: моря
      море+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Gen: морей
      море+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Loc: морях
      море+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Dat: морям
      море+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Ins: морями
  Noun - слово M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      слово+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom: слово
      слово+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc: слово
      слово+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen: слова
      слово+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc: слове
      слово+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat: слову
      слово+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins: словом
      слово+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Nom: слова
      слово+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Acc: слова
      слово+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Gen: слов
      слово+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Loc: словах
      слово+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Dat: словам
      слово+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Ins: словами
